Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2433.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2105 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2105. Project selection criteria.(a) Selection criteria.--The Department of Transportation shall award grants under section 2104(a)(1) (relating to use of money in fund) on a competitive basis, subject to subsection (b). The department may not reserve, designate or set aside a specific level of funding or percentage of funds to an applicant prior to the completion of the application process, nor may the department designate a set percentage of funds to an applicant.(b) Recycled materials.--When awarding grants under subsection (a), the department shall give priority to applications for projects that will utilize recycled asphalt and 123456789101112131415161718 materials, including reclaimed asphalt pavement and recycled asphalt shingles, in such mixed-use design as permitted by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2433PN3238 - 2 - 1234